Maryland, session 2026, HB0521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–222.
(d) The Commission shall encourage and promote the efficient use and
conservation of energy in support of the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and
targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the
Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle
by:
(1) requiring each electric company and gas company to establish any
program or service that the Commission determines to be appropriate and cost–effective;
AND
(2) [adopting rate–making policies that provide, through a surcharge line
item on customer bills:
(i) full cost recovery of reasonably incurred costs for programs and
services established under item (1) of this subsection, including full recovery on a current
basis on or before January 1, 2028;
(ii) on or before December 31, 2032, the elimination of any unpaid
costs and unamortized costs that:
1. A. existed on December 31, 2024; or
B. were incurred before January 1, 2028; and
2. were accrued for the purpose of achieving statutory
targets for annual incremental gross energy savings;
(iii) compensation for any unpaid costs and unamortized costs under
item (ii) of this item at not more than each electric company’s and each gas company’s
average cost of outstanding debt; and
(iv) reasonable financial performance incentives and penalties for
investor–owned electric companies and gas companies, as appropriate; and
(3)] ensuring that adoption of electric customer choice under Subtitle 5 of
this title and gas customer choice under Subtitle 6 of this title does not adversely impact
these goals and targets.

HOUSE BILL 521 3
[(e) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric company
and each gas company subject to subsection (a) of this section that has submitted to the
Commission, on or before July 1, 2024, a plan for achieving electricity or gas savings and
demand reduction targets to disclose the following information in a form and format readily
understandable to the average customer:
(1) that the surcharge imposed in accordance with subsection (d) of this
section includes the cost of paying down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs that were
accrued over time by programs and services required by the Commission dating back to
2008; and
(2) the period of time that the surcharge will include excess charges to pay
down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs.]
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(4) to provide rate relief by offsetting electricity rates of residential
customers[, including an offset of surcharges imposed on ratepayers under Title 7, Subtitle
2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article];
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.